Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-103.06
Campus, defined.

Campus, as it pertains to the southern
boundary of the main campus of the University of Nebraska-Lincoln, means the
south right-of-way line of R Street and abandoned R Street from 10th to 17th
streets and, as it pertains to the western boundary of the main campus of
the University of Nebraska-Lincoln, means the east right-of-way line of 10th
Street from R Street to Holdrege Street (Salt Creek Roadway).

Laws 2010, LB861, § 14.